Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1274.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9107. Noise barrier construction required.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall erect a highway noise barrier on the southbound side of Interstate 295 in Middletown Township, Bucks County, between New Falls Road and Trenton Road, which is located between mile markers 2.2 and 0.7.(b) Interfund transfer.--The sum of $40,000,000 is transferred from the General Fund to a restricted account, which is established, within the Motor License Fund. Money in the restricted account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purpose of administering subsection (a).(c) Unexpended funds.--Any money transferred to the Motor License Fund under subsection (b) that is unexpended, 12345678910111213141516171819 uncommitted and unencumbered by the department after the department has completed the highway noise barrier under subsection (a) shall be transferred from the Motor License Fund to the General Fund.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1274PN1427 - 2 - 12345